California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(c) The Department of Justice shall inform the bureau, within 60 days from receipt of the information specified in subdivision (b), of the applicant’s eligibility to possess, receive, purchase, or own a firearm pursuant to state and federal law.

(d) An applicant who has been denied a firearm permit based upon subdivision (a) may reapply for the permit after the prohibition expires. The bureau shall treat this application as an initial application and shall follow the required screening process as specified in this section.

(e) The bureau shall not issue a firearm permit pursuant to this chapter to an applicant who, within the past 12 months, has been found incapable of exercising appropriate judgment, restraint, and self-control, for the purposes of carrying and using a firearm during the course of his or her duties, pursuant to the assessment required under Section 7583.47 for a permit associated with a security guard registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 50.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7596.81.

(a) The bureau shall not renew a firearm permit if the applicant is prohibited from possessing, receiving, purchasing, or owning a firearm pursuant to state or federal law.

(b) Before renewing a firearm permit, the bureau shall provide the Department of Justice with the information necessary to identify the renewal applicant.

(c) The Department of Justice shall inform the bureau, within 30 days of receipt of the information specified in subdivision (b), of the renewal applicant’s eligibility under state and federal law to possess, receive, purchase, or own a firearm.

(d) An applicant who is
 denied a firearm permit renewal based upon subdivision (a) may reapply for the permit after the prohibition expires. The bureau shall treat this as an initial application and shall follow the screening process specified in Section 7596.8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 377, Sec. 40.   (SB 609)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7596.82.

(a) The Department of Justice may charge the bureau a fee sufficient to reimburse the department’s costs for furnishing firearm eligibility information upon submission of the application for issuance or renewal of a firearm permit. The fee charged shall not exceed the actual costs for system development, maintenance, and processing necessary to provide this service.

(b) The bureau shall collect the fee described in subdivision (a) for all initial and renewal applications for firearm permits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1341, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

7596.83.

(a) A firearm permit may be automatically revoked if at any time the Department of Justice notifies the bureau that the holder of the firearm permit is prohibited from possessing, receiving, or purchasing a firearm pursuant to state or federal law. Following the automatic revocation, an administrative hearing shall be provided upon written request to the bureau in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) The bureau may seek an emergency order pursuant to Article 13 (commencing with Section 11460.10) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code against the holder of the firearms permit if, after the bureau’s investigation relating to any of the following
 events, the bureau determines that the holder of the firearms permit presents an undue hazard to public safety that may result in substantial injury to another:

(1) Receipt of subsequent arrest information of an arrest for any of the following:

(A) Assault.

(B) Battery.

(C) Any use of force or violence on any person committed by the permitholder.

(2) A report from a bureau-approved firearms training facility or instructor made pursuant to Section 7585.18.

(3) A report from the permitholder’s employer or former employer that the permitholder may be a threat to public safety.

(4) A complaint filed by any member of the public that the permitholder may be a threat to public safety.

(5) If the permitholder has been determined incapable of exercising appropriate judgment, restraint, and self-control pursuant to the assessment required under Section 7583.47 for a permit associated with a security guard registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 46.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7596.12.

Every person licensed, registered, or designated under this chapter, who in the course of his or her employment carries tear gas, or any other nonlethal chemical agent, shall complete the course required pursuant to Section 22835 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 178, Sec. 11.   (SB 1115)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 107 of Ch. 178.)
-------------------------------------------

7596.13.

A licensee shall not permit any employee to carry tear gas, or any other nonlethal chemical agent, prior to ascertaining that the employee is proficient in the use of tear gas or other nonlethal chemical agent. Evidence of proficiency shall include a certificate from a POST-approved or Department of Justice-approved training facility that the person is proficient in the use of tear gas or other nonlethal chemical agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Prohibited Acts and Citations for Firearms and Nonlethal Weapons [7597. - 7597.6.]

7597.

The director may assess fines as enumerated in this article pursuant to Section 7591.9. Assessment of administrative fines shall be independent of any other action by the bureau or any local, state, or federal governmental agency which may result from a violation of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7597.1.

(a) A licensee, qualified manager, branch office manager, or alarm agent shall not carry, use, or possess a loaded or unloaded firearm in the course and scope of his or her employment, whether or not it is serviceable or operative, unless he or she has in his or her possession a valid and current firearms qualification card issued to him or her by the bureau. The card shall be shown to any peace officer or bureau representative upon demand.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to a duly appointed peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, or a federal qualified law enforcement officer, as defined in Section 926B of Title 18 of the United States Code, who
 meets all of the following:

(1) He or she has successfully completed a course of study in the use of firearms.

(2) He or she is authorized to carry a concealed firearm in the course and scope of his or her employment pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 25450) of Chapter 2 of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code.

(3) He or she has proof that he or she has applied to the bureau for a firearms qualification card.

(c) A fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) may be assessed for the first violation of this section and a fine of five hundred dollars ($500) for each subsequent violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 52.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7597.2.

(a) A licensee, qualified manager, branch office manager, or alarm agent shall not carry any inoperable, replica, or other simulated firearm.

(b) A violation of this section shall result in a fine of one hundred dollars ($100) for the first violation and a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each subsequent violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 53.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7597.3.

(a) No licensee, qualified manager, branch office manager, or alarm agent shall use a firearm which is in violation of law, or in knowing violation of the standards for carrying and usage of firearms, as taught in the course of training in the carrying and use of firearms, including, but not limited to:

(1) Illegally using, carrying, or possessing a dangerous weapon.

(2) Brandishing a weapon.

(3) Drawing a weapon without proper cause.

(4) Provoking a shooting incident without cause.

(5) Carrying or using a firearm while on duty under the influence of alcohol or dangerous drugs.

(6) Carrying or using a firearm of a caliber for which a bureau firearms permit has not been issued.

(7) Carrying or using a firearm while performing duties not related to the qualifying license, certificate, or registration to which the bureau associated the firearms permit.

(b) A fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000) and a suspension of the firearms permit for six months may be assessed for the first violation of this section and a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000) and a suspension of the firearms permit for not more than one year for a subsequent violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 54.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7597.5.

(a) A licensee, qualified manager, branch office manager, or alarm agent shall not carry or use tear gas or any other nonlethal chemical agent in the performance of his or her duties, unless he or she has in his or her possession proof of completion of a course in the carrying and use of tear gas or other nonlethal chemical agent.

(b) A fine of one hundred dollars ($100) may be assessed for the first violation of this section and a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each subsequent violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 55.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7597.6.

(a) A licensee, qualified manager, branch office manager, or alarm agent shall not carry a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person in a concealed manner unless one of the following circumstances apply:

(1) The person has been issued a permit to carry that firearm in a concealed manner by a local law enforcement agency pursuant to Section 26150, 26155, 26170, or 26215 of the Penal Code.

(2) The person is an honorably retired peace officer authorized to carry a concealed firearm pursuant to Section 25650 of the Penal Code or Article 2 (commencing with Section 25450) of Chapter 2 of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the
 Penal Code.

(3) The person is a duly appointed peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, who is authorized to carry a concealed firearm in the course and scope of his or her employment pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 25450) of Chapter 2 of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code.

(b) A fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000) may be assessed for each violation of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 56.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Powers to Arrest and Registration of Employees [7598.1. - 7598.17.]

7598.1.

(a) Every person entering the employ of a licensee, performing the function of an alarm agent who responds to alarm systems shall complete a course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force, prior to being assigned to a duty location responding to an alarm system.

(b) Evidence of completion shall consist of certification by the licensee or instructor that the course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force has been taught, the date the course was taught, and certification by the employee that the instruction was received. Evidence of completion of the course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force shall be maintained in the licensee’s employee records and made available to
 the bureau upon request.

(c) A qualified manager is not required to register under this article.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 697, Sec. 28) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 49.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7598.2.

(a) The course of training in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force may be administered, tested, and certified by any licensee. The department may approve any person or school to teach the course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force. The course of training shall be approximately four hours in length and cover the following topics:

(1) Responsibilities and ethics in citizen arrest.

(2) Relationship with the public police in arrest.

(3) Limitations on security guard power to arrest.

(4) Restrictions on searches and seizures.

(5) Criminal and civil liabilities.

(A) Personal liability.

(B) Employer liability.

(6) The appropriate use of force, including all of the following topics:

(A) Legal standards for use of force.

(B) Duty to intercede.

(C) The use of objectively reasonable force.

(D) Supervisory responsibilities.

(E) Use of force review and analysis.

(F) De-escalation and interpersonal communication training, including tactical methods that use time, distance, cover, and concealment, to avoid escalating situations that lead to violence.

(G) Implicit and explicit bias and cultural competency.

(H) Skills, including de-escalation techniques, to effectively, safely, and respectfully interact with people with disabilities or behavioral health issues.

(I) Use of force scenario training, including simulations of low-frequency, high-risk situations and calls for service, shoot-or-don’t-shoot situations, and real-time
 force option decisionmaking.

(J) Mental health and policing, including bias and stigma.

(K) Active shooter situations.

(7) Any other topic deemed appropriate by the bureau, excluding Weapons of Mass Destruction and Terrorism Awareness, which may be an elective topic only.

(b) Paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) shall be conducted through traditional classroom instruction. For the purposes of this subdivision, “traditional classroom instruction” means instruction where the instructor is physically present with students in a classroom and is available to answer students’ questions while providing the required training. In this setting, the instructor provides
 demonstrations and hands-on instruction in order to establish each student’s proficiency as to the course content.

(c) The department shall make available a guidebook as a standard for teaching the course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force. The department shall encourage additional training and may provide a training guide recommending additional courses.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 2.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7598.3.

(a) No employee of a licensee performing the function of an alarm agent who responds to alarm systems shall be issued a firearms qualification card until proper certification by the instructor that the course of training in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force has been taught, and the employee’s certification that the instruction was received, has been delivered to the department.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 697, Sec. 32) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 53.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7598.4.

(a) Within three working days after commencing employment, any employee performing the function of alarm agent, who is not currently registered with the bureau, shall submit to the bureau a completed application for registration, two classifiable fingerprint cards, one set of which shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for purposes of a background check, and the appropriate registration fee. All information obtained on the application shall be confidential pursuant to the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code) and shall not be released to the public except for the registrant’s full name, the employer’s name and address, and the registration number. Nothing in this section shall preclude the release of information to the public regarding the status of a registrant, or the release of information to law enforcement agencies or other governmental agencies for other authorized purposes.

(b) No application is required to be submitted if the employee terminated employment within the three working days. “Within three working days” means 72 hours from the time an employee is first compensated for alarm agent services by a licensee.

(c) The bureau may impose a fee not to exceed three dollars ($3) for processing classifiable fingerprint cards submitted by applicants, excluding those submitted into an electronic fingerprint system using electronic fingerprint technology.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 318, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7598.5.

The application for registration under this article shall be on a form prescribed by the director and shall be accompanied by the fee as prescribed in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7598.6.

The application shall be verified and shall include the following:

(a) The full name, residence address, telephone number, and date of birth of the employee.

(b) The name, address, telephone number, and license number of the employer and the date the employment commenced.

(c) A statement as to whether the employee has been convicted of a misdemeanor, excluding minor traffic violations.

(d) A statement as to whether the employee has been convicted of a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 876, Sec. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

7598.7.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), an employee of a licensee may be assigned to work with a temporary application for registration until the bureau issues a registration card or denies the application for registration. A temporary application for registration shall be a copy of the initial application. Any alarm agent employee assigned to work must carry either a temporary application for registration or a valid registration. A temporary application for registration shall in no event be valid for more than 120 days. However, the director may extend the expiration date beyond the 120 days if there is an abnormal delay in processing applications for registration. For purposes of this section, the 120-day period shall commence on the date the applicant signs and submits the application.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an employee who has been convicted of a crime prior to applying for registration shall not be issued a temporary application for registration and shall not be assigned to work as an alarm agent until the bureau issues a permanent registration card. This subdivision shall apply only if the applicant for registration has disclosed the conviction to the bureau on his or her application form, or if the fact of the conviction has come to the attention of the bureau through official court or other governmental documents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7598.8.

No employee of a licensee shall carry or use a firearm unless the employee has in his or her possession a valid alarm agent registration card and a valid firearm qualification card issued pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7598.9.

The bureau, upon receipt of a criminal offense record or record of a subsequent arrest from the California Department of Justice, shall make an immediate determination of fitness for registration of applicants for registration or firearms qualification permit, when information contained in the records of the Department of Justice makes such a determination possible. Applications for registration of those determined to be unfit shall be immediately denied.

The bureau shall keep a current and accurate record of the individuals who have applied for and been denied registration or firearms qualification permits. A listing consisting of individual names and other pertinent identifying information may be made of those individuals who have been denied. The listing may be updated bimonthly and made available to interested licensees and law enforcement agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7598.11.

If the chief determines that an applicant’s criminal history contains arrest information for which there appears no disposition, the chief shall issue a notice to the applicant allowing the applicant 45 days for the applicant to provide documentation concerning the disposition of the arrest or arrests.

The notice shall be sent to the applicant and shall provide sufficient information to assist the applicant in complying with the chief’s request. If the applicant fails to respond within 45 days, the applicant’s employment shall be automatically suspended until the bureau obtains the necessary documentation to approve or deny the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1299, Sec. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

7598.12.

If the director determines that continued employment of an applicant or registrant, in his or her current capacity, may present an undue hazard to public safety, the licensee, upon proper notification from the director, shall suspend the applicant or registrant from employment in that capacity.

A registrant or applicant may request a review by the Alarm Company Disciplinary Review Committee as set forth in Section 7591.19 to appeal the suspension.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1299, Sec. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

7598.14.

Upon approval of an application for registration, the chief shall cause to be issued to the applicant, at their last known address, a registration card in a form approved by the director. The applicant may request to be issued an enhanced pocket card that shall be composed of a durable material and may incorporate technologically advanced security features. The bureau may charge a fee sufficient to reimburse the department’s costs for furnishing the enhanced license. The fee charged may not exceed the actual costs for system development, maintenance, and processing necessary to provide this service, and may not exceed six dollars ($6). If the applicant does not request an enhanced card, the department shall issue a standard card at no cost to the applicant. Every
 person, while engaged in any activity for which registration is required, shall display their valid pocket card as provided by regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 376, Sec. 28.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7598.16.

A licensee shall at all times be responsible for ascertaining that his or her employees subject to registration are currently registered or have made proper application for registration as provided in this article. The licensee may not have in his or her employment a person whose registration has expired, or been revoked, denied, suspended, or canceled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7598.17.

(a) A registration issued under this chapter expires at midnight on the last day of the month two years following the date of issuance
 unless renewed. At least 60 days prior to the expiration of a registration, a registrant who desires to renew his or her registration shall forward to the bureau a completed registration renewal application and renewal fee. The renewal application shall be on a form prescribed by the director, dated and signed by the applicant, certifying under penalty of perjury that the information in the application is true and correct.

(b) The licensee shall provide
 to any employee information regarding procedures for renewal of registration.

(c) An expired registration may be renewed provided the registrant files a renewal application on a form prescribed by the director and the renewal and delinquency fees prescribed by this chapter are returned to the bureau within 60 days of the expiration date of the registration. A firearms permit is not valid while the registration is expired.

(d) A registration not renewed within 60 days following its expiration may not be renewed thereafter. The holder of the expired registration may obtain a new registration only on compliance with all of the provisions of this chapter relating to the
 issuance of an original registration. The delinquency fee is 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the date of expiration, but not less than twenty-five dollars ($25).

(e) The holder of an expired registration shall not engage in the activity for which a registration is required until the bureau issues a renewal registration.

(f) If the renewed registration card has not been delivered to the registrant, prior to the date of expiration of the prior registration, the registrant may present evidence of renewal to substantiate continued registration, for a period not to exceed 90 days after the date of expiration.

(g) A registration may not be renewed or reinstated until all fines assessed pursuant to Section 7591.9 and not resolved in accordance with the provisions of that section have been paid.

(h) A new registration shall be issued subject to payment of all fines assessed pursuant to Section 7591.9 and not resolved in accordance with the provisions of Section 7591.9 and payment of all applicable fees.

(i) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2018, and, as of January 1, 2019, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 40.5.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Inoperative July 1, 2018.   Repealed as of January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

7598.17.

(a) A registration issued under this chapter expires at midnight on the last day of the month two years following the date of issuance unless renewed. At least 60 days prior to the expiration of a registration, a registrant who desires to renew his or her registration shall forward to the bureau a completed registration renewal application and renewal fee. The renewal application shall be on a form prescribed by the director, dated and signed by the applicant, certifying under penalty of perjury that the information in the application is true and correct.

(b) The licensee shall provide to any employee information regarding procedures for renewal of registration.

(c) An expired registration may be renewed provided the registrant files a renewal application on a form prescribed by the director and the renewal and delinquency fees prescribed by this chapter are returned to the bureau within 60 days of the expiration date of the registration. A firearms permit is not valid while the registration is expired.

(d) A registration not renewed within 60 days following its expiration may not be renewed thereafter. The holder of the expired registration may obtain a new registration only on compliance with all of the provisions of this chapter relating to the issuance of an original registration.

(e) The holder of an expired registration shall not engage in the activity for which a
 registration is required until the bureau issues a renewal registration.

(f) If the renewed registration card has not been delivered to the registrant prior to the date of expiration of the prior registration, the registrant may present evidence of renewal to substantiate continued registration, for a period not to exceed 90 days after the date of expiration.

(g) A registration may not be renewed or reinstated until all fines assessed pursuant to Section 7591.9 and not resolved in accordance with the provisions of that section have been paid.

(h) A new registration shall be issued subject to payment of all fines assessed pursuant to Section 7591.9 and not resolved in accordance with the provisions of Section 7591.9 and payment
 of all applicable fees.

(i) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Ch. 573) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 55.5.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Prohibited Acts and Citations for Registered Employees [7598.50. - 7598.53.]

7598.50.

The director may assess fines as enumerated in this article pursuant to Section 7591.9. Assessment of administrative fines shall be independent of any other action by the bureau, or any local, state, or federal governmental agency, which may result from a violation of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7598.51.

(a) (1) An alarm agent shall carry on their person, while on duty, either a valid and current registration card or a temporary application for registration and a valid photo identification. The registration card or temporary application may be in a digital format.

(2) The temporary application shall include the application number that is assigned at the time that the application is received.

(b) For purposes of this section, “digital format” shall include, but not be limited to, an easily legible screenshot or image of the registration card or temporary application. 

(c) A fine of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) may be assessed for each violation of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 376, Sec. 29.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7598.53.

An alarm agent who responds to an alarm system shall wear a prominently displayed patch or other designation which clearly identifies the name of the licensee. An alarm agent who carries a deadly weapon while responding to an alarm system shall wear a recognizable uniform with a prominently displayed patch or other designation which clearly identifies the name of the licensee. The uniform must be distinguishable from the uniforms worn by local regular law enforcement officers. A violation of this section may result in a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 58.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Alarm Company Operators—Qualifications and Examination [7599. - 7599.10.]

7599.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, an applicant for a qualified manager certificate for an alarm company operator license shall:

(a) Have had at least two years’ experience in alarm company work or the equivalent thereof as determined by the director.

A year’s experience shall consist of not less than 2,000 hours of actual compensated alarm company work performed by each applicant preceding the filing of an application.

Applicants shall substantiate the claimed years and hours of qualifying experience and the exact details as to the character and nature thereof by written
 certifications from employers on forms prescribed by the director, subject to independent verification by the director as they may determine. In the event the applicant is unable to supply a written certification from an employer, the applicant may offer such other written certifications as may be properly considered by the director. In addition, applicants shall supply such evidence for consideration, as may be required by the director.

(b) Be at least 18 years of age.

(c) Complete and forward to the bureau an application for a qualified manager certificate for an alarm company operator license, which shall be on a form prescribed by the director. The application shall be accompanied by two classifiable sets of the applicant’s fingerprints.

(d) Pass the required examination.

(e) Pay the required application and examination fees to the chief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 376, Sec. 30.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7599.4.

The director shall issue a qualified manager certificate to any person meeting the requirements of Section 7599. The certificate shall be posted, along with the alarm company operator license, in a conspicuous place at the principal place of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7599.5.

Examinations shall be given at least once every other month at such places and on such specific dates as the director may from time to time determine and fix.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7599.6.

In order to be eligible for an initial examination, an applicant shall have completed and filed his or her application together with the application fee prescribed by this chapter in the office of the bureau in Sacramento, California, and have his or her experience independently verified by the bureau, not later than 30 days prior to the next scheduled examination date. Applicants shall not be scheduled until a thorough investigation has been concluded by the bureau. Applicants whose applications are not completed and filed within the time limits of this section may, at the discretion of the director, be scheduled for the next scheduled examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 876, Sec. 48.)
-------------------------------------------

7599.7.

If an applicant fails to pass an initial examination or fails to appear as scheduled for an examination, he or she shall not be eligible for any subsequent examination except upon payment of the reexamination fee for each subsequent examination, accompanied by a completed application for reexamination duly filed within the time limits and conditions relating to applications for original examinations provided in Section 7599.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7599.8.

All applicants shall be examined concerning their competency, experience, and qualifications by the chief. The chief may take testimony of anyone in regard thereto under oath.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7599.9.

If an applicant fails to complete his or her application within one year after it has been filed, or fails to take the examination within a one-year period after becoming eligible therefor, the application shall be considered to be abandoned. An application submitted subsequent to the abandonment of a former application shall be treated as a new application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7599.10.

Every qualified manager certificate issued under this chapter shall be subject to the same renewal provisions which apply to an alarm company operator license as set forth in Sections 7593.11, 7593.12, 7593.13, and 7593.14.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Alarm Company Operators—Licensed and Registered Locations [7599.20. - 7599.29.]

7599.20.

For purposes of this article, “branch office” means any additional location, other than the alarm company operator’s principal place of business, where the selling, monitoring, installation, or servicing of alarms is administered, directed, or controlled.

A telephone answering service or a telephone call forwarding device shall not be deemed to be a branch office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7599.21.

Any licensed alarm company operator, who maintains or proposes to maintain a branch office as defined in this article, shall apply and qualify for a branch office registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7599.22.

The application for a branch office registration under this article shall be on a form prescribed by the director and shall be accompanied by the fee as set forth in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7599.23.

The application shall include:

(a) The full name, address of the licensed location, telephone number at the licensed location, the name of the qualified manager, and license number of the applicant.

(b) The name and registration number of the designated branch office manager. The individual shall:

(1) Be at least 18 years of age.

(2) Be currently registered as an alarm agent.

(3) Read the Alarm Company Act and sign a statement declaring that he or she has read the act. The statement shall be dated, signed by the qualified manager, maintained in the licensee’s employee records and made available to the bureau upon request.

(c) The address of the branch office and the telephone number at the branch office.

(d) The signature of the qualified manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7599.24.

Upon receipt of the application for a branch office registration, the chief shall issue a “Branch Office Registration.” The registration shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the branch office location.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7599.25.

Each branch office registration shall be managed and supervised by a designated branch office manager. However, each registered branch office and designated branch office manager shall be under the active management supervision of the qualified manager of the licensee. A branch office may be managed for 120 days from the date of initial application for registration under the direction of the qualified manager of the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1104, Sec. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

7599.29.

Every branch office registration issued under this chapter shall be subject to the same renewal provisions which apply to a license as set forth in Sections 7593.11, 7593.12, 7593.13, and 7593.14.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Alarm Company Operators—Conduct of Business, Prohibited Acts and Citations [7599.30. - 7599.59.]

7599.30.

The director may assess fines for any violation as enumerated in this article, pursuant to Section 7591.9.

Assessment of administrative fines shall be independent of any other action by the bureau or any local, state, or federal governmental agency which may result from a violation of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7599.31.
